Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1312 Six-year program and financial
plan for school repair and maintenance. (a) The department of education
shall prepare a six-year program and financial plan for school repair and
maintenance that shall be:

(1) Based on:

(A) Estimated preventive and scheduled
maintenance costs;

(B) Budgeted recurring maintenance;

(C) Health and safety requirements; and

(D) Legal mandates;

(2) Insofar as is practical, prepared in accordance
with the principles and procedures contained in section 514A-83.6 or 514B-148;
and

(3) Submitted initially to the legislature not less
than thirty days prior to the convening of the 2002 regular session, with
annual funding requirements for the physical plant operations and maintenance
account submitted not less than thirty days prior to the convening of the 2002
regular session and each regular session thereafter;

provided that the governor may incorporate the
six-year program and financial plan required by this subsection into the
six-year program and financial plan required by section 37-69, if the plan
required by this subsection is incorporated without reductions or restrictions.

(b) The department of education shall develop
and maintain a facilities physical analysis report and a facilities financial
analysis report for each public school. These reports shall be posted
electronically on the Internet.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the
superintendent of education shall develop and implement appropriate planning
procedures and follow-up accountability reports to ensure sound planning,
control, and accountability in the use of moneys allocated by the legislature.
The department of education shall annually post on the department's website
information that shall include:

(1) List of projects initiated by the department of
education; and

(2) List of projects completed with associated actual
cost. [L 2001, c 316, pt of §3(1); am L 2003, c 188, §7; am L 2004, c 164, §9;
am L 2005, c 93, §7 and c 189, §5; ree L 2006, c 38, §7; am L 2008, c 28, §6;
am L 2012, c 133, §26; am L 2014, c 232, §16]

Note

Section 302A-1309 referred to in subsection (c) is repealed.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next